Utah statutes.
32A-12-304 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Making false statements.

(1) (a)  Any person who makes any false material statement under oath or affirmation in any official proceeding before the commission or the department is guilty of a second degree felony.

(b)  As used in Subsection (1)(a), "material" statement is as defined in Section 76-8-501.

(2)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if that person knowingly:

(a)  makes a false statement under oath or affirmation in any official proceeding before the commission or the department;

(b)  makes a false statement with a purpose to mislead a public servant in performing that servant's official functions under this title;

(c)  makes a false statement and the statement is required by this title to be sworn or affirmed before a notary or other person authorized to administer oaths;

(d)  makes a false written statement on or pursuant to any application, form, affidavit, or document required by this title;

(e)  creates a false impression in a written application, form, affidavit, or document required by this title by omitting information necessary to prevent statements in them from being misleading;

(f)  makes a false written statement with intent to deceive a public servant in the performance of that servant's official functions under this title; or

(g)  submits or invites reliance on any writing or document required under this title which he knows to be lacking in authenticity.

(3)  A person is not guilty under Subsection (2) if that person retracts the falsification before it becomes apparent that the falsification was or would be exposed.

